New Mexico, session 2026, HB163.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO: SECTION 1. A new section of Chapter 31, Article 3 NMSA 1978 is enacted to read: "[NEW MATERIAL] DENIAL OF BAIL--DESIGNATION OF DANGEROUS OR VIOLENT FELONY OFFENSES.--For the purposes of a hearing to deny bail initiated by a prosecuting authority pursuant to Article 2, Section 13 of the constitution of New Mexico, the following felony offenses are designated as dangerous or violent felony offenses: A. first degree murder, as provided in Section 30-2-1 NMSA 1978; B. second degree murder, as provided in Section 30-2-1 NMSA 1978; C. voluntary manslaughter, as provided in Section 30-2-3 NMSA 1978; D. third degree aggravated battery against a household member, as provided in Section 30-3-16 NMSA 1978; E. first degree kidnapping, as provided in Section 30-4-1 NMSA 1978; F. first and second degree criminal sexual penetration and aggravated criminal sexual penetration, as provided in Section 30-9-11 NMSA 1978; G. second and third degree criminal sexual contact of a minor, as provided in Section 30-9-13 NMSA 1978; H. first and second degree robbery, as provided in Section 30-16-2 NMSA 1978; I. second degree aggravated arson, as provided in Section 30-17-6 NMSA 1978; J. shooting at a dwelling or occupied building, as provided in Section 30-3-8 NMSA 1978; K. shooting at or from a motor vehicle, as provided in Section 30-3-8 NMSA 1978; L. aggravated battery upon a peace officer, as provided in Section 30-22-25 NMSA 1978; M. assault with intent to commit a violent felony upon a peace officer, as provided in Section 30-22-23 NMSA 1978; N. aggravated assault upon a peace officer, as provided in Section 30-22-22 NMSA 1978; O. a felony that was committed while the defendant brandished or discharged a firearm; or P. any of the following offenses, if the court determines that the underlying allegations or resulting harm are of a dangerous or violent nature: (1) involuntary manslaughter, as provided in Section 30-2-3 NMSA 1978; (2) fourth degree aggravated assault, as provided in Section 30-3-2 NMSA 1978; (3) third degree assault with intent to commit a violent felony, as provided in Section 30-3-3 NMSA 1978; (4) fourth degree aggravated assault against a household member, as provided in Section 30-3-13 NMSA 1978; (5) third degree assault against a household member with intent to commit a violent felony, as provided in Section 30-3-14 NMSA 1978; (6) third and fourth degree aggravated stalking, as provided in Section 30-3A-3.1 NMSA 1978; (7) second degree kidnapping, as provided in Section 30-4-1 NMSA 1978; (8) second degree abandonment of a child, as provided in Section 30-6-1 NMSA 1978; (9) first, second and third degree abuse of a child, as provided in Section 30-6-1 NMSA 1978; (10) third degree dangerous use of explosives, as provided in Section 30-7-5 NMSA 1978; (11) third and fourth degree criminal sexual penetration, as provided in Section 30-9-11 NMSA 1978; (12) fourth degree criminal sexual contact of a minor, as provided in Section 30-9-13 NMSA 1978; (13) third degree robbery, as provided in Section 30-16-2 NMSA 1978; (14) third degree homicide by vehicle or great bodily harm by vehicle, as provided in Section 66-8-101 NMSA 1978; or (15) battery upon a peace officer, as provided in Section 30-22-24 NMSA 1978." SECTION 2. CONTINGENT EFFECTIVE DATE.--The provisions of this act shall become effective upon certification by the secretary of state that the constitution of New Mexico has been amended as proposed by a joint resolution of the second session of the fifty-seventh legislature, entitled "A JOINT RESOLUTION PROPOSING TO AMEND ARTICLE 2, SECTION 13 OF THE CONSTITUTION OF NEW MEXICO TO PROVIDE THAT A COURT OF RECORD MAY DENY BAIL FOR A PERSON CHARGED WITH A FELONY OFFENSE IF THE PROSECUTING AUTHORITY PROVES BY CLEAR AND CONVINCING EVIDENCE THAT RELEASE CONDITIONS WILL NOT REASONABLY PROTECT ANY OTHER PERSON OR THE COMMUNITY OR THAT THE PERSON IS A FLIGHT RISK; ALLOWING THE COURT TO PRESUME THAT RELEASE CONDITIONS WILL NOT REASONABLY PROTECT ANY OTHER PERSON OR THE COMMUNITY IF THE PERSON IS CHARGED WITH A FELONY OFFENSE DESIGNATED BY LAW AS A DANGEROUS OR VIOLENT FELONY OFFENSE; PROVIDING THAT A PERSON CHARGED WITH A DANGEROUS OR VIOLENT FELONY OFFENSE MAY REBUT A COURT'S PRESUMPTION BY A PREPONDERANCE OF THE EVIDENCE.". - 5 -